Washington statutes.
RCW 15.80.590

Denial, suspension, or revocation of licenses—Hearing.

The director is hereby authorized to deny, suspend, or revoke a license in any case in which he or she finds that there has been a failure to comply with the requirements of this chapter or rules adopted hereunder. For hearings for revocations, suspension, or denial of a license, the director shall give the licensee or applicant such notice as is required under the provisions of chapter 34.05 RCW. Such hearings shall be subject to chapter 34.05 RCW (administrative procedure act) concerning adjudicative proceedings.

[ 2017 c 158 s 12; 2010 c 8 s 6109; 1989 c 175 s 52; 1969 ex.s. c 100 s 30.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1989 c 175: See note following RCW 34.05.010.